New York, session 2025-2026, S7906.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph 4 of subsection (t) of section 606 of the tax 2 law, as added by section 1 of part DD of chapter 63 of the laws of 2000, 3 is amended to read as follows: 4 (4) Amount of credit. If allowable college tuition expenses are less 5 than five thousand dollars, the amount of the credit provided under this 6 subsection shall be equal to the applicable percentage of the lesser of 7 allowable college tuition expenses or two hundred dollars. If allowable 8 college tuition expenses are five thousand dollars or more, the amount 9 of the credit provided under this subsection shall be equal to the 10 applicable percentage of the allowable college tuition expenses multi- 11 plied by four percent. Such applicable percentage shall be [twenty-five 12 percent for taxable years beginning in two thousand one, fifty percent 13 for taxable years beginning in two thousand two, seventy-five percent 14 for taxable years beginning in two thousand three and one hundred 15 percent for taxable years beginning after two thousand three] computed 16 in the following manner: 17 For unmarried individuals, a head of a household, or a married indi- 18 vidual filing a separate return: 19 If New York adjusted gross The applicable percentage is: 20 income is: 21 Not over $1,000,000 100% 22 Over $1,000,000 but not over $5,000,000 50% 23 Over $5,000,000 but not over $10,000,000 25% 24 Over $10,000,000 0%. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11075-03-5 S. 7906 2 1 For married individuals who make a single return jointly or surviving 2 spouses: 3 If New York adjusted gross The applicable percentage is: 4 income is: 5 Not over $1,500,000 100% 6 Over $1,500,000 but not over $7,500,000 50% 7 Over $7,500,000 but not over $15,000,000 25% 8 Over $15,000,000 0%. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 10 ing the date on which it shall have become a law and shall apply to 11 taxable years beginning on or after such date.